Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Rural Road and Bridge Construction Program

§ 65-11-39.
Definitions for rural road and bridge construction program.

When used in Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59, unless the context indicates otherwise:

The term “construction” shall mean the supervising, inspection, actual building, and all expenses incidental to the construction or reconstruction of a road or bridge, including locating, surveying, mapping, cost of right of way, and elimination of the hazards of railway grade crossings.

The term “county roads” shall mean all county roads now under the jurisdiction of, or being maintained by, the board of supervisors of any county.

The term “board of supervisors” shall mean the board of supervisors of each county in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-21; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 1.

§ 65-11-41.
Purpose of rural road and bridge construction program.

It being recognized that county roads and bridges of the various counties of the state have deteriorated to a considerable extent during the past several years, and it being further recognized that the selection, construction, and improvement of a system of all-weather county roads and bridges is a matter of primary state-wide concern, it is hereby declared to be the purpose of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59 to provide for a county rural road and bridge construction program in addition and supplemental to that provided by cooperation with the Federal Highway Act of 1944, in addition to that provided by Sections 65-11-1 through 65-11-37.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-22; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 2.

§ 65-11-43.
Apportionment of funds between counties.

The funds hereinafter appropriated for the purpose of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59 shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated on warrants issued by the State Auditor of Public Accounts, and the said auditor shall issue his warrants upon requisition signed by the chancery clerk of each county for the sum appropriated such county. Each county shall receive nine one-thousandths (.009) of the total appropriation made to carry out the provisions of said sections, and the balance of said appropriation shall be apportioned by the state auditor among all the counties according to the following formula: one third in the ratio which the area of each county bears to the total area of the state; one third in the ratio which the rural population of each county bears to the total rural population of the state, as shown by the federal census of 1940; and one third in the ratio which the mileage of rural delivery and star routes in each county bears to the total mileage of rural delivery and star routes in the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-23; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 3.

§ 65-11-45.
Amounts available.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The State Fiscal Management Board shall notify the board of supervisors of each county of the amount of money to be available for expenditure in such county from any appropriation made by the state for the purpose of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59. The board of supervisors, upon the receipt of such notice, shall divide the amount available for such county among the five (5) supervisors districts. All funds which may be appropriated for the purpose of said sections shall be expended for materials and labor in construction and improvement of county roads and bridges selected by the board of supervisors of each county. However, the board of supervisors shall first select for construction and reconstruction all school bus routes and, next, rural mail routes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-24; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 4; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 47, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-11-45.
Amounts available.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The State Fiscal Management Board shall notify the board of supervisors of each county of the amount of money to be available for expenditure in such county from any appropriation made by the state for the purpose of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59. The board of supervisors, upon the receipt of such notice, shall deposit the amount available for such county into the county road and bridge fund. All funds which may be appropriated for the purpose of said sections shall be expended for materials and labor in construction and improvement of county roads and bridges selected by the board of supervisors of each county. However, the board of supervisors shall first select for construction and reconstruction all school bus routes and, next, rural mail routes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-24; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 4; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 47, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-11-47.
Selection of roads and bridges.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of each county, at its next regular or special meeting after receipt of notice of the amount of money apportioned such county, shall spread upon the minutes of such meeting the roads and bridges selected by it to be constructed or improved in its respective district or beat. In the selection of such projects the boards of supervisors shall select roads and bridges which will be of the greatest benefit to the district or beat as a whole, judged from the standpoint of relative use and importance. However, if the board of supervisors selects a portion of the federal aid farm-to-market system, as set up in Sections 65-11-1 through 65-11-37, then the road shall be built up to the specifications for the federal aid farm-to-market system, and the funds made available under Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59 shall be expended under the provisions of the former sections. No reference is intended to any order of the board of supervisors heretofore made with reference to farm-to-market roads in the respective counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-25; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 5; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 48, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-11-47.
Selection of roads and bridges.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of each county, at its next regular or special meeting after receipt of notice of the amount of money apportioned such county, shall spread upon the minutes of such meeting the roads and bridges selected by it to be constructed or improved. In the selection of such projects the boards of supervisors shall select roads and bridges which will be of the greatest benefit to the county as a whole, judged from the standpoint of relative use and importance. However, if the board of supervisors selects a portion of the federal aid farm-to-market system, as set up in Sections 65-11-1 through 65-11-37, then the road shall be built up to the specifications for the federal aid farm-to-market system, and the funds made available under Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59 shall be expended under the provisions of the former sections. No reference is intended to any order of the board of supervisors heretofore made with reference to farm-to-market roads in the respective counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-25; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 5; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 48, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-11-49.
Engineer to supervise construction.

The board of supervisors of counties who do not have an engineer employed are hereby authorized and empowered to employ a competent engineer to prepare all necessary surveys, plans, and specifications and to supervise the construction and repairing of roads and bridges in their respective counties. The salary of same shall be paid from the common fund of said county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-26; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 6.

§ 65-11-51.
Letting of contracts for rural road and bridge construction.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

All contracts for the construction of projects under the terms and provisions of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59 shall be let and awarded by the board of supervisors in the manner and method now provided by law for the awarding of contracts for the improvement and construction of county roads and bridges. The cost and expense of the letting of such contracts shall be paid by the county, or from any funds provided for such purpose. In counties having sufficient equipment and labor, the boards of supervisors may build the roads and bridges in their respective districts or beats without the letting of contracts, and may pay for labor and material therefor out of any funds appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise made available to carry out the provisions of the aforesaid sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-27; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 7; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 49, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-11-51.
Letting of contracts for rural road and bridge construction.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

All contracts for the construction of projects under the terms and provisions of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59 shall be let and awarded by the board of supervisors in the manner and method now provided by law for the awarding of contracts for the improvement and construction of county roads and bridges. The cost and expense of the letting of such contracts shall be paid by the county, or from any funds provided for such purpose. In counties having sufficient equipment and labor, the boards of supervisors may build the roads and bridges without the letting of contracts, and may pay for labor and material therefor out of any funds appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise made available to carry out the provisions of the aforesaid sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-27; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 7; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 49, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-11-53.
Authority to expend any available funds.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to use and expend any county road or bridge funds available to supplement and to be used in conjunction with state appropriated funds in the construction of roads and bridges and to secure necessary rights of way.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-28; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 8.

§ 65-11-55.
Funds may be used for state highways.

Any county may, by resolution of its board of supervisors, request that all or any portion of the moneys available for expenditure in such county be expended on any secondary highway in such county or on the state highway system, as may be agreed upon by the board of supervisors of such county and the state highway department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-29; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 9.

§ 65-11-57.
Rules and regulations.

The board of supervisors is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions and purposes of Sections 65-11-39 through 65-11-59.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-30; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 10.

§ 65-11-59.
Limitation on expenditures.

The board of supervisors shall not expend any of said funds for machinery or other equipment or tools.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-31; Laws, 1946, ch. 219, § 11.